Illinois, session 104th, HB4517.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Authorized Electronic Monitoring in 5Long-Term Care Facilities Act is amended by changing Sections 65, 15, 20, 25, 30, 40, 45, 55, and 60 as follows: 7    (210 ILCS 32/5)8    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 9    "Authorized electronic monitoring" means the placement and 10use of an electronic monitoring device by a resident in his or 11her room in accordance with this Act.12    "Department" means the Department of Public Health. 13    "Electronic monitoring device" means a surveillance 14instrument with a fixed position video camera or an audio 15recording device, or a combination thereof, that is installed 16in a resident's room under the provisions of this Act and 17broadcasts or records activity or sounds occurring in the 18room.19    "Establishment" means an assisted living establishment as 20defined in the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act. 21    "Facility" means an intermediate care facility for the 22developmentally disabled licensed under the ID/DD Community 23Care Act that has 30 beds or more, a facility licensed under   HB4517 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18029 BAB 31468 b1the MC/DD Act, a long-term care facility licensed under the 2Nursing Home Care Act, or a facility that provides housing to 3individuals with dementia, as defined in Section 3 of the 4Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Act. 5    "Resident" means a person residing in a facility or 6establishment.7    "Resident's representative" has the meaning given to that 8term in (1) Section 1-123 of the Nursing Home Care Act if the 9resident resides in a facility licensed under the Nursing Home 10Care Act, (2) Section 1-123 of the ID/DD Community Care Act if 11the resident resides in a facility licensed under the ID/DD 12Community Care Act, (3) Section 9-10 of the Assisted Living 13and Shared Housing Act if the resident resides in an 14establishment under the Assisted Living and Shared Housing 15Act, or (4) (3) Section 1-123 of the MC/DD Act if the resident 16resides in a facility licensed under the MC/DD Act.17    "Room" means a resident's designated private or shared 18living space, apartment, or living unit designed for personal 19use and sleeping. 20(Source: P.A. 101-160, eff. 7-26-19.) 21    (210 ILCS 32/15)22    Sec. 15. Consent. 23    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a 24resident, a resident's plenary guardian of the person, or the 25parent of a resident under the age of 18 must consent in   HB4517 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18029 BAB 31468 b1writing on a notification and consent form prescribed by the 2Department to the authorized electronic monitoring in the 3resident's room. If the resident has not affirmatively 4objected to the authorized electronic monitoring and the 5resident's physician determines that the resident lacks the 6ability to understand and appreciate the nature and 7consequences of electronic monitoring, the following 8individuals may consent on behalf of the resident, in order of 9priority:10        (1) a health care agent named under the Illinois Power 11    of Attorney Act;12        (2) a resident's representative, as defined in Section 13    5 of this Act;14        (3) the resident's spouse;15        (4) the resident's parent;16        (5) the resident's adult child who has the written 17    consent of the other adult children of the resident to act 18    as the sole decision maker regarding authorized electronic 19    monitoring; or20        (6) the resident's adult brother or sister who has the 21    written consent of the other adult siblings of the 22    resident to act as the sole decision maker regarding 23    authorized electronic monitoring.24    (a-5) Prior to another person, other than a resident's 25plenary guardian of the person, consenting on behalf of a 26resident 18 years of age or older in accordance with this   HB4517 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18029 BAB 31468 b1Section, the resident must be asked by that person, in the 2presence of a facility or establishment employee, if he or she 3wants authorized electronic monitoring to be conducted. The 4person must explain to the resident:5        (1) the type of electronic monitoring device to be 6    used;7        (2) the standard conditions that may be placed on the 8    electronic monitoring device's use, including those listed 9    in paragraph (7) of subsection (b) of Section 20;10        (3) with whom the recording may be shared according to 11    Section 45; and12        (4) the resident's ability to decline all recording.13    For the purposes of this subsection, a resident 14affirmatively objects when he or she orally, visually, or 15through the use of auxiliary aids or services declines 16authorized electronic monitoring. The resident's response must 17be documented on the notification and consent form.18    (b) A resident or roommate may consent to authorized 19electronic monitoring with any conditions of the resident's 20choosing, including, but not limited to, the list of standard 21conditions provided in paragraph (7) of subsection (b) of 22Section 20. A resident or roommate may request that the 23electronic monitoring device be turned off or the visual 24recording component of the electronic monitoring device be 25blocked at any time.26    (c) Prior to the authorized electronic monitoring, a   HB4517 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 18029 BAB 31468 b1resident must obtain the written consent of any other resident 2residing in the room on the notification and consent form 3prescribed by the Department. Except as otherwise provided in 4this subsection, a roommate, a roommate's plenary guardian of 5the person, or the parent of a roommate under the age of 18 6must consent in writing to the authorized electronic 7monitoring in the resident's room. If the roommate has not 8affirmatively objected to the authorized electronic monitoring 9in accordance with subsection (a-5) and the roommate's 10physician determines that the roommate lacks the ability to 11understand and appreciate the nature and consequences of 12electronic monitoring, the following individuals may consent 13on behalf of the roommate, in order of priority:14        (1) a health care agent named under the Illinois Power 15    of Attorney Act;16        (2) a roommate's resident's representative, as defined 17    in Section 5 of this Act;18        (3) the roommate's spouse;19        (4) the roommate's parent;20        (5) the roommate's adult child who has the written 21    consent of the other adult children of the resident to act 22    as the sole decision maker regarding authorized electronic 23    monitoring; or24        (6) the roommate's adult brother or sister who has the 25    written consent of the other adult siblings of the 26    resident to act as the sole decision maker regarding   HB4517 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 18029 BAB 31468 b1    authorized electronic monitoring.2    (c-5) Consent by a roommate under subsection (c) 3authorizes the resident's use of any recording obtained under 4this Act, as provided in Section 45 of this Act.5    (c-7) Any resident previously conducting authorized 6electronic monitoring must obtain consent from any new 7roommate before the resident may resume authorized electronic 8monitoring. If a new roommate does not consent to authorized 9electronic monitoring and the resident conducting the 10authorized electronic monitoring does not remove or disable 11the electronic monitoring device, the facility or 12establishment shall turn off the device.13    (d) Consent may be withdrawn by the resident or roommate 14at any time, and the withdrawal of consent shall be documented 15in the resident's clinical record. If a roommate withdraws 16consent and the resident conducting the authorized electronic 17monitoring does not remove or disable the electronic 18monitoring device, the facility or establishment may turn off 19the electronic monitoring device.20    (e) If a resident who is residing in a shared room wants to 21conduct authorized electronic monitoring and another resident 22living in or moving into the same shared room refuses to 23consent to the use of an electronic monitoring device, the 24facility or establishment shall make a reasonable attempt to 25accommodate the resident who wants to conduct authorized 26electronic monitoring. A facility or establishment has met the   HB4517 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 18029 BAB 31468 b1requirement to make a reasonable attempt to accommodate a 2resident who wants to conduct authorized electronic monitoring 3when upon notification that a roommate has not consented to 4the use of an electronic monitoring device in his or her room, 5the facility or establishment offers to move either resident 6to another shared room that is available at the time of the 7request. If a resident chooses to reside in a private room in 8order to accommodate the use of an electronic monitoring 9device, the resident must pay the private room rate. If a 10facility or establishment is unable to accommodate a resident 11due to lack of space, the facility or establishment must 12reevaluate the request every 2 weeks until the request is 13fulfilled.14(Source: P.A. 99-430, eff. 1-1-16; 99-784, eff. 1-1-17.) 15    (210 ILCS 32/20)16    Sec. 20. Notice to the facility or establishment. 17    (a) Authorized electronic monitoring may begin only after 18a notification and consent form prescribed by the Department 19has been completed and submitted to the facility or 20establishment. 21    (b) A resident shall notify the facility or establishment 22in writing of his or her intent to install an electronic 23monitoring device by providing a completed notification and 24consent form prescribed by the Department that must include, 25at minimum, the following information:  HB4517 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 18029 BAB 31468 b1        (1) the resident's signed consent to electronic 2    monitoring or the signature of the person consenting on 3    behalf of the resident in accordance with Section 15 of 4    this Act; if a person other than the resident signs the 5    consent form, the form must document the following: 6            (A) the date the resident was asked if he or she 7        wants authorized electronic monitoring to be conducted 8        in accordance with subsection (a-5) of Section 15;9            (B) who was present when the resident was asked; 10        and11            (C) an acknowledgement that the resident did not 12        affirmatively object; and13        (2) the resident's roommate's signed consent or the 14    signature of the person consenting on behalf of the 15    resident in accordance with Section 15 of this Act, if 16    applicable, and any conditions placed on the roommate's 17    consent; if a person other than the roommate signs the 18    consent form, the form must document the following:19            (A) the date the roommate was asked if he or she 20        wants authorized electronic monitoring to be conducted 21        in accordance with subsection (a-5) of Section 15;22            (B) who was present when the roommate was asked; 23        and24            (C) an acknowledgement that the roommate did not 25        affirmatively object; and26        (3) the type of electronic monitoring device to be   HB4517 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 18029 BAB 31468 b1    used;2        (4) any installation needs, such as mounting of a 3    device to a wall or ceiling;4        (5) the proposed date of installation for scheduling 5    purposes;6        (6) a copy of any contract for maintenance of the 7    electronic monitoring device by a commercial entity;8        (7) a list of standard conditions or restrictions that 9    the resident or a roommate may elect to place on use of the 10    electronic monitoring device, including, but not limited 11    to:12            (A) prohibiting audio recording;13            (B) prohibiting broadcasting of audio or video;14            (C) turning off the electronic monitoring device 15        or blocking the visual recording component of the 16        electronic monitoring device for the duration of an 17        exam or procedure by a health care professional;18            (D) turning off the electronic monitoring device 19        or blocking the visual recording component of the 20        electronic monitoring device while dressing or bathing 21        is performed; and22            (E) turning the electronic monitoring device off 23        for the duration of a visit with a spiritual advisor, 24        ombudsman, attorney, financial planner, intimate 25        partner, or other visitor; and26        (8) any other condition or restriction elected by the   HB4517 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 18029 BAB 31468 b1    resident or roommate on the use of an electronic 2    monitoring device. 3    (c) A copy of the completed notification and consent form 4shall be placed in the resident's and any roommate's clinical 5record and a copy shall be provided to the resident and his or 6her roommate, if applicable.7    (d) The Department shall prescribe the notification and 8consent form required in this Section no later than 60 days 9after the effective date of this Act. If the Department has not 10prescribed such a form by that date, the Office of the Attorney 11General shall post a notification and consent form on its 12website for resident use until the Department has prescribed 13the form. 14(Source: P.A. 99-430, eff. 1-1-16.) 15    (210 ILCS 32/25)16    Sec. 25. Cost and installation. 17    (a) A resident choosing to conduct authorized electronic 18monitoring must do so at his or her own expense, including 19paying purchase, installation, maintenance, and removal costs.20    (b) If a resident chooses to install an electronic 21monitoring device that uses Internet technology for visual or 22audio monitoring, that resident is responsible for contracting 23with an Internet service provider.24    (c) The facility or establishment shall make a reasonable 25attempt to accommodate the resident's installation needs,   HB4517 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 18029 BAB 31468 b1including, but not limited to, allowing access to the 2facility's or establishment's telecommunications or equipment 3room. A facility or establishment has the burden of proving 4that a requested accommodation is not reasonable.5    (d) The electronic monitoring device must be placed in a 6conspicuously visible location in the room.7    (e) A facility or establishment may not charge the 8resident a fee for the cost of electricity used by an 9electronic monitoring device.10    (f) All electronic monitoring device installations and 11supporting services shall comply with the requirements of the 12edition of the National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) 101 13Life Safety Code in force at the time of installation and shall 14remain in compliance with that or any subsequent edition of 15NFPA 101 enforced pursuant to Part 483 of Title 42 of the Code 16of Federal Regulations.17(Source: P.A. 99-430, eff. 1-1-16; 99-784, eff. 1-1-17.) 18    (210 ILCS 32/30)19    Sec. 30. Notice to visitors. 20    (a) If a resident of a facility conducts authorized 21electronic monitoring, a sign shall be clearly and 22conspicuously posted at all building entrances accessible to 23visitors. The notice must be entitled "Electronic Monitoring" 24and must state, in large, easy-to-read type, "The rooms of 25some residents may be monitored electronically by or on behalf   HB4517 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 18029 BAB 31468 b1of the residents.". An assisted living establishment shall not 2be required to post the notice described in this Section at 3building entrances. 4    (b) A sign shall be clearly and conspicuously posted at 5the entrance to a resident's room where authorized electronic 6monitoring is being conducted. The notice must state, in 7large, easy-to-read type, "This room is electronically 8monitored.".9    (c) The facility or establishment is responsible for 10installing and maintaining the signage required in this 11Section.12(Source: P.A. 99-430, eff. 1-1-16.) 13    (210 ILCS 32/40)14    Sec. 40. Obstruction of electronic monitoring devices. 15    (a) A person or entity is prohibited from knowingly 16hampering, obstructing, tampering with, or destroying an 17electronic monitoring device installed in a resident's room 18without the permission of the resident or the individual who 19consented on behalf of the resident in accordance with Section 2015 of this Act.21    (b) A person or entity is prohibited from knowingly 22hampering, obstructing, tampering with, or destroying a video 23or audio recording obtained in accordance with this Act 24without the permission of the resident or the individual who 25consented on behalf of the resident in accordance with Section   HB4517 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 18029 BAB 31468 b115 of this Act.2    (c) A person or entity that violates this Section is 3guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. A person or entity that 4violates this Section in the commission of or to conceal a 5misdemeanor offense is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. A 6person or entity that violates this Section in the commission 7of or to conceal a felony offense is guilty of a Class 4 8felony. 9    (d) It is not a violation of this Section if a person or 10facility or establishment turns off the electronic monitoring 11device or blocks the visual recording component of the 12electronic monitoring device at the direction of the resident 13or the person who consented on behalf of the resident in 14accordance with Section 15 of this Act. 15(Source: P.A. 99-430, eff. 1-1-16.) 16    (210 ILCS 32/45)17    Sec. 45. Dissemination of recordings. 18    (a) A facility or establishment may not access any video 19or audio recording created through authorized electronic 20monitoring without the written consent of the resident or the 21person who consented on behalf of the resident in accordance 22with Section 15 of this Act. 23    (b) Except as required under the Freedom of Information 24Act, a recording or copy of a recording made pursuant to this 25Act may only be disseminated for the purpose of addressing   HB4517 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 18029 BAB 31468 b1concerns relating to the health, safety, or welfare of a 2resident or residents.3    (c) The resident or person who consented on behalf of the 4resident in accordance with Section 15 of this Act shall 5provide a copy of any video or audio recording to parties 6involved in a civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding, 7upon a party's request, if the video or audio recording was 8made during the time period that the conduct at issue in the 9proceeding allegedly occurred.10(Source: P.A. 99-430, eff. 1-1-16.) 11    (210 ILCS 32/55)12    Sec. 55. Report. Each facility or establishment shall 13report to the Department, in a manner prescribed by the 14Department, the number of authorized electronic monitoring 15notification and consent forms received annually. The 16Department shall report the total number of authorized 17electronic monitoring notification and consent forms received 18by facilities or establishment to the Office of the Attorney 19General annually. 20(Source: P.A. 99-430, eff. 1-1-16.) 21    (210 ILCS 32/60)22    Sec. 60. Liability.23    (a) A facility or establishment is not civilly or 24criminally liable for the inadvertent or intentional   HB4517 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 18029 BAB 31468 b1disclosure of a recording by a resident or a person who 2consents on behalf of the resident for any purpose not 3authorized by this Act.4    (b) A facility or establishment is not civilly or 5criminally liable for a violation of a resident's right to 6privacy arising out of any electronic monitoring conducted 7pursuant to this Act.8(Source: P.A. 99-430, eff. 1-1-16.)